Maryland, session 2025, SB0899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–205.2, 7–205.3, and 7–205.4 of Article – Education of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–205.3, 7–205.4, and 7–205.5, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
7–205.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CLASS” MEANS A COHORT OF STUDENTS IN THE SAME GRADE
LEVEL.
(3) “HIGH SCHOOL” MEANS A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE
STATE THAT OFFERS A PROGRAM OF INSTRUCTION FOR AT LEAST GRADES 11 AND
12, INCLUDING A VIRTUAL SCHOOL ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 14 OF THIS
TITLE.
(4) “PUBLIC SENIOR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 10–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO STUDENTS ENROLLED IN A HIGH
SCHOOL.
(C) BEGINNING WITH THE STUDENTS ENTERING GRADE 12 FOR THE
2025–2026 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH HIGH SCHOOL SHALL PREPARE A CLASS RANKING
OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) IF A HIGH SCHOOL CLASS HAS AT LEAST 15 STUDENTS, ON
COMPLETION OF GRADE 11, EACH STUDENT IN THE HIGH SCHOOL CLASS SHALL BE
RANKED ON THE BASIS OF ACADEMIC ACHIEVEMENT USING A STUDENT’S OVERALL
CUMULATIVE GRADE POINT AVERAGE AS THE SOLE CRITERION FOR THE RANKING.

SENATE BILL 899 3
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH HIGH
SCHOOL CLASS RANKING SHALL IDENTIFY THE STUDENTS WHO RANK IN THE TOP 5%
AND 10% OF THEIR HIGH SCHOOL CLASS.
(3) IF A HIGH SCHOOL CLASS MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS TO BE
RANKED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION BUT HAS FEWER THAN 20
STUDENTS:
(I) THE HIGHEST RANKED STUDENT SHALL BE DESIGNATED AS
BEING THE ONLY STUDENT IN THE TOP 5% OF THEIR HIGH SCHOOL CLASS; AND
(II) THE SECOND HIGHEST RANKED STUDENT SHALL BE
DESIGNATED AS BEING THE ONLY STUDENT IN THE TOP 10% OF THEIR HIGH SCHOOL
CLASS.
(E) (1) ON COMPLETION OF THE HIGH SCHOOL CLASS RANKING
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, EACH STUDENT WHO RANKS
IN THE TOP 10% OF THEIR HIGH SCHOOL CLASS SHALL BE NOTIFIED BY THE HIGH
SCHOOL OF THE STUDENT’S CLASS RANK.
(2) A HIGH SCHOOL CLASS RANKING IN THE TOP 5% OR 10% AS
DETERMINED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(I) DESIGNATED ON A STUDENT’S HIGH SCHOOL TRANSCRIPT,
AS APPLICABLE; AND
(II) USED TO ESTABLISH ELIGIBILITY FOR GUARANTEED
ADMISSIONS TO A PUBLIC SENIOR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION UNDER §
15–101.1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(F) THE PERCENTAGE DESIGNATIONS FOR A HIGH SCHOOL CLASS RANKING
UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(3) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL BE USED ONLY TO ESTABLISH ELIGIBILITY FOR
GUARANTEED ADMISSIONS TO A PUBLIC SENIOR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION UNDER § 15–101.1 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) DO NOT PRECLUDE A COUNTY BOARD OR HIGH SCHOOL FROM
USING AN ALTERNATIVE METHOD FOR CALCULATING THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS IN
THE TOP 5% AND 10% OF THEIR HIGH SCHOOL CLASS FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE.
10–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 899
(m) “Public senior higher education institution” means:
(1) The constituent institutions of the University System of Maryland and
the University of Maryland Center for Environmental Science;
(2) Morgan State University; and
(3) St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
15–101.
(a) (1) [Each] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH
public institution of higher education shall accept for admission any graduate of an
approved public high school:
[(1)] (I) Who is certified by his high school principal, based on standards
of the State Board of Education, as qualified to pursue a course of study at the institution;
or
[(2)] (II) Who meets the admission standards of the institution.
(2) EACH PUBLIC SENIOR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
SHALL ACCEPT FOR ADMISSION ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO QUALIFIES FOR GUARANTEED
ADMISSION UNDER § 15–101.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
15–101.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “HIGH SCHOOL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–205.2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) EACH PUBLIC SENIOR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL
ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR ACCEPTING ELIGIBLE HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS WHO
APPLY FOR ADMISSION TO THE INSTITUTION UNDER A GUARANTEED ADMISSION
POLICY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, BEGINNING IN THE
2026–2027 ACADEMIC YEAR, A HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT IS ELIGIBLE FOR
GUARANTEED ADMISSION TO A PUBLIC SENIOR HIGHER EDUCATION INSTITUTION IF
THE STUDENT:
(1) HAS COMPLETED OR IS EXPECTED TO COMPLETE ALL OF THE
PREREQUISITE COURSES THAT ARE REQUIRED BY THE INSTITUTION TO WHICH THE
STUDENT APPLIES;

SENATE BILL 899 5
(2) APPLIES FOR ADMISSION TO AN INSTITUTION:
(I) BY THE REQUIRED APPLICATION DEADLINE ESTABLISHED
BY THE INSTITUTION;
(II) DURING GRADE 12 OF HIGH SCHOOL OR THE FINAL YEAR OF
HOME INSTRUCTION; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, INDICATES
ON THE APPLICATION THAT THE STUDENT QUALIFIES FOR GUARANTEED
ADMISSION; AND
(3) SATISFIES ONE OF THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(I) IS RANKED IN THE TOP 10% OF THE STUDENT’S HIGH
SCHOOL CLASS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–205.2 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) IS DESIGNATED AS A FINALIST IN THE NATIONAL MERIT
SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY THE NATIONAL MERIT SCHOLARSHIP
CORPORATION OR HAS ACHIEVED AN EQUIVALENT DESIGNATION UNDER A
SUCCESSOR PROGRAM OR BY A SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION; OR
(III) 1. PARTICIPATES IN A HOME INSTRUCTION PROGRAM;
AND
2. HAS ATTAINED A SCORE ON A NATIONALLY ACCEPTED
COLLEGE ENTRANCE EXAMINATION THAT PLACES THE INDIVIDUAL’S SCORE IN AT
LEAST THE 90TH PERCENTILE FOR THE EXAMINATION CYCLE.
(D) A HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT MAY BE ELIGIBLE FOR GUARANTEED
ADMISSION TO THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS ONLY IF
THE STUDENT:
(1) APPLIES FOR ADMISSION BY THE EARLY APPLICATION DEADLINE
ESTABLISHED BY THE INSTITUTION;
(2) SATISFIES ONE OF THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(I) IS RANKED IN THE TOP 5% OF THE STUDENT’S HIGH SCHOOL
CLASS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–205.2 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) IS DESIGNATED AS A FINALIST IN THE NATIONAL MERIT
SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY THE NATIONAL MERIT SCHOLARSHIP

SENATE BILL 899
CORPORATION OR HAS ACHIEVED AN EQUIVALENT DESIGNATION UNDER A
SUCCESSOR PROGRAM OR BY A SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION; OR
(III) 1. PARTICIPATES IN A HOME INSTRUCTION PROGRAM;
AND
2. HAS ATTAINED A SCORE ON A NATIONALLY ACCEPTED
COLLEGE ENTRANCE EXAMINATION THAT PLACES THE STUDENT’S SCORE IN AT
LEAST THE 98TH PERCENTILE FOR THE EXAMINATION CYCLE; AND
(3) MEETS THE OTHER REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION FOR GUARANTEED ADMISSION.
(E) IF A HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT ELIGIBLE FOR GUARANTEED ADMISSION
UNDER THIS SECTION APPLIES TO MORE THAN ONE PUBLIC SENIOR INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION, THE STUDENT SHALL DESIGNATE THE ONE INSTITUTION TO
WHICH THE STUDENT DESIRES GUARANTEED ADMISSION.
(F) A PUBLIC SENIOR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY:
(1) VERIFY ANY INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE INSTITUTION AND
PROVIDED BY A HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT INDICATING ELIGIBILITY FOR GUARANTEED
ADMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) REVOKE A STUDENT’S OFFER OF ADMISSION AT THE INSTITUTION
UNDER THE GUARANTEED ADMISSION POLICY UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE
STUDENT:
(I) IS NOT AWARDED A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA BEFORE THE
STUDENT’S ANTICIPATED MATRICULATION DATE;
(II) ENGAGES IN ACADEMIC MISCONDUCT;
(III) AFTER THE STUDENT’S APPLICATION IS SUBMITTED,
EXPERIENCES SIGNIFICANTLY DECLINING GRADES SUCH THAT, UNDER THE
INSTITUTION’S STANDARD APPLICATION PROCESS, WOULD JUSTIFY THE
INSTITUTION REVOKING AN OFFER FOR ADMISSION; OR
(IV) MISREPRESENTED ANY INFORMATION ON THE STUDENT’S
APPLICATION REGARDING THE ELIGIBILITY OF THE STUDENT FOR GUARANTEED
ADMISSION, INCLUDING CLASS RANK, COLLEGE ENTRANCE EXAMINATION SCORE,
OR STATUS AS A FINALIST IN THE NATIONAL MERIT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 899 7
(G) THE PROVISIONS IN THIS SECTION DO NOT GUARANTEE A HIGH SCHOOL
STUDENT ELIGIBLE FOR GUARANTEED ADMISSION PLACEMENT IN ANY SPECIFIC
PROGRAM OFFERED BY THE PUBLIC SENIOR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
OR TO ANY SPECIFIC COLLEGE, SCHOOL, OR FUNCTIONAL EQUIVALENT WITHIN THE
INSTITUTION TO WHICH THE STUDENT APPLIES.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.